Hawaii statutes.
[§128E-7] Emergency notification
requirements. The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter
91 establishing the contents of hazardous substance release reports. The rules
shall address, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) The quantities of designated hazardous substances
that are deemed reportable pursuant to this chapter when released;

(2) The specific periods of time within which these
quantities are deemed reportable pursuant to this chapter after being released;

(3) The agencies to which reports of releases must be
made; and

(4) The format in which the release is to be
reported. [L 1993, c 300, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next